Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle C. Voting Trusts and Agreements.

§79-4-7.30.
Voting trusts.

One or more shareholders may create a voting trust, conferring on a trustee the right to vote or otherwise act for them, by signing an agreement setting out the provisions of the trust (which may include anything consistent with its purpose) and transferring their shares to the trustee. When a voting trust agreement is signed, the trustee shall prepare a list of the names and addresses of all owners of beneficial interests in the trust, together with the number and class of shares each transferred to the trust, and deliver copies of the list and agreement to the corporation’s principal office.

A voting trust becomes effective on the date the first shares subject to the trust are registered in the trustee’s name. A voting trust is valid for the period specified in the trust agreement.

All or some of the parties to a voting trust may extend it for additional terms by signing an extension agreement and obtaining the voting trustee’s written consent to the extension. An extension is valid for the period specified in the extension agreement. The voting trustee must deliver copies of the extension agreement and list of beneficial owners to the corporation’s principal office. An extension agreement binds only those parties signing it.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.30; Laws, 2017, ch. 369, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment rewrote the second sentence of (b), which read: “A voting trust is valid for not more than ten (10) years after its effective date unless extended under subsection (c)”; and in (c), deleted “of not more than ten (10) years each” following “additional terms” in the first sentence, and rewrote the second sentence, which read: “An extension is valid for ten (10) years from the date the first shareholder signs the extension agreement.”

Inapplicability of provisions of this section to voting agreements, see § 79-4-7.31.

Validity of provision of voting trust against transfer of beneficiary’s interest. 11 A.L.R.2d 1000.

Removal of trustee of voting trust. 34 A.L.R.2d 1136.

Validity and effect of agreement controlling the vote of corporate stock. 45 A.L.R.2d 799.

Validity of voting trust or other similar agreement for control of voting power of corporate stock. 98 A.L.R.2d 376.

Right, as between pledgor and pledgee, to vote pledged stock.
68 A.L.R.3d 680.

Validity of stockholders’ agreement allegedly infringing on directors’ management powers – modern cases.
15 A.L.R.4th 1078.

Validity of voting trust created by will. 77 A.L.R.4th 1194.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 956 et seq.

6B Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1713, 74:1735 (discharge of voting trustees on termination of voting trust agreement).

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 649.

§79-4-7.31.
Voting agreements.

Two (2) or more shareholders may provide for the manner in which they will vote their shares by signing an agreement for that purpose. A voting agreement created under this section is not subject to the provisions of Section 79-4-7.30.

A voting agreement created under this section is specifically enforceable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.31, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Appointment of party to voting agreement created under this section as appointment coupled with an interest, see § 79-4-22.

Validity and effect of agreement controlling the vote of corporate stock. 45 A.L.R.2d 799.

Right, as between pledgor and pledgee, to vote pledged stock.
68 A.L.R.3d 680.

Validity of stockholders’ agreement allegedly infringing on directors’ management powers – modern cases.
15 A.L.R.4th 1078.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 944 et seq.

6B Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:1735 (discharge of voting trustees on termination of voting trust agreement).

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 648.

Kruger, Corporate pooling agreements and restriction-of-directors agreements. 10 Anglo-American Law Review 73, 1981.

§79-4-7.32.
Certain agreements among shareholders, otherwise inconsistent with chapter, permitted; conditions.

An agreement among the shareholders of a corporation that complies with this section is effective among the shareholders and the corporation even though it is inconsistent with one or more other provisions of this chapter in that it:

Eliminates the board of directors or restricts the discretion or powers of the board of directors;

Governs the authorization or making of distributions whether or not in proportion to ownership of shares, subject to the limitations in Section 79-4-6.40;

Establishes who shall be directors or officers of the corporation, or their terms of office or manner of selection or removal;

Governs, in general or in regard to specific matters, the exercise or division of voting power by or between the shareholders and directors or by or among any of them, including use of weighted voting rights or director proxies;

Establishes the terms and conditions of any agreement for the transfer or use of property or the provision of services between the corporation and any shareholder, director, officer or employee of the corporation or among any of them;

Transfers to one or more shareholders or other persons all or part of the authority to exercise the corporate powers or to manage the business and affairs of the corporation, including the resolution of any issue about which there exists a deadlock among directors or shareholders;

Requires dissolution of the corporation at the request of one or more of the shareholders or upon the occurrence of a specified event or contingency; or

Otherwise governs the exercise of the corporate powers or the management of the business and affairs of the corporation or the relationship among the shareholders, the directors and the corporation, or among any of them, and is not contrary to public policy.

An agreement authorized by this section shall be:

Set forth (A) in the articles of incorporation or bylaws and approved by all persons who are shareholders at the time of the agreement, or (B) in a written agreement that is signed by all persons who are shareholders at the time of the agreement and is made known to the corporation;

Subject to amendment only by all persons who are shareholders at the time of the amendment, unless the agreement provides otherwise; and

Valid for ten (10) years, unless the agreement provides otherwise.

The existence of an agreement authorized by this section shall be noted conspicuously on the front or back of each certificate for outstanding shares or on the information statement required by Section 79-4-6.26(b). If at the time of the agreement the corporation has shares outstanding represented by certificates, the corporation shall recall the outstanding certificates and issue substitute certificates that comply with this subsection. The failure to note the existence of the agreement on the certificate or information statement shall not affect the validity of the agreement or any action taken pursuant to it. Any purchaser of shares who, at the time of purchase, did not have knowledge of the existence of the agreement shall be entitled to rescission of the purchase. A purchaser shall be deemed to have knowledge of the existence of the agreement if its existence is noted on the certificate or information statement for the shares in compliance with this subsection (c) and, if the shares are not represented by a certificate, the information statement is delivered to the purchaser at or prior to the time of purchase of the shares. An action to enforce the right of rescission authorized by this subsection (c) must be commenced within the earlier of ninety (90) days after discovery of the existence of the agreement or two (2) years after the time of purchase of the shares.

An agreement authorized by this section shall cease to be effective when the corporation becomes a public corporation. If the agreement ceases to be effective for any reason, the board of directors may, if the agreement is contained or referred to in the corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws, adopt an amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws, without shareholder action, to delete the agreement and any references to it.

An agreement authorized by this section that limits the discretion or powers of the board of directors shall relieve the directors of, and impose upon the person or persons in whom such discretion or powers are vested, liability for acts or omissions imposed by law on directors to the extent that the discretion or powers of the directors are limited by the agreement.

The existence or performance of an agreement authorized by this section shall not be a ground for imposing personal liability on any shareholder for the acts or debts of the corporation even if the agreement or its performance treats the corporation as if it were a partnership or results in failure to observe the corporate formalities otherwise applicable to the matters governed by the agreement.

Incorporators or subscribers for shares may act as shareholders with respect to an agreement authorized by this section if no shares have been issued when the agreement is made.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 368, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 417, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 429, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

The 2006 amendment substituted “chapter” for “act” following provisions of this” in (a); and substituted “when the corporation becomes a public corporation” for “when shares of the corporation are listed on a national securities exchange or regularly traded in a market maintained by one or more members of a national or affiliated securities association” in (d).

Requirement for and duties of Board of Directors, generally, see § 79-4-8.01.

18-19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1 et seq.

18-19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1 et seq.